Maryland, session 2025, HB0756.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0756*

HOUSE BILL 756
Article – Estates and Trusts
13–223.
(A) ON THE FILING OF A PETITION FOR GUARDIANSHIP OF THE PROPERTY
OF AN ALLEGED DISABLED PERSON, A PETITIONER PARTY TO THE GUARDIANSHIP
MAY FILE A REQUEST TO FOR THE STAY OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING CIVIL ACTIONS
OR PROCEEDINGS AGAINST THE ALLEGED DISABLED PERSON WITH THE COURT
PRESIDING OVER THE CIVIL ACTION OR PROCEEDING:
(1) AN ACTION FOR FAILURE TO PAY RENT UNDER § 8–401 OF THE
REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(2) A WARRANT OF RESTITUTION UNDER § 8–401 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(3) AN ACTION FOR WRONGFUL DETAINER UNDER § 14–132 OF THE
REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(4) A FORECLOSURE ACTION UNDER § 7–105.1 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(5) A SHERIFF’S SALE UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE COURTS
ARTICLE; AND
(6) AN ACTION AGAINST THE PROPERTY OF THE ALLEGED DISABLED
PERSON.
(B) A PARTY TO THE GUARDIANSHIP OF THE PROPERTY OF AN ALLEGED
DISABLED PERSON REQUESTING THE STAY OF AN ACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE PETITION AND REQUEST TO ALL
PARTIES TO THAT ACTION; AND
(2) NOTIFY A COURT GRANTING A STAY UNDER THIS SECTION AND
ANY PARTY TO THE ACTION OF:
(I) THE APPOINTMENT OF A TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT
GUARDIAN OF THE PROPERTY OF THE DISABLED PERSON; OR
(II) THE DENIAL, DISMISSAL, OR WITHDRAWAL OF THE
PETITION.

HOUSE BILL 756 3
(C) (1) A STAY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY REMAIN IN
EFFECT UNTIL: FOR NOT MORE THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF THE PETITION.
(2) THE COURT SHALL LIFT A STAY UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION ON:
(1) (I) THE COURT APPOINTS APPOINTMENT OF A TEMPORARY OR
PERMANENT GUARDIAN OF THE PROPERTY OF THE DISABLED PERSON, WHICHEVER
OCCURS FIRST; OR
(2) (II) THE COURT DENIES DENIAL OF THE PETITION.
(C) (D) (1) TO EFFECTUATE SERVICE OF PROCESS ON AN ALLEGED
DISABLED PERSON FOR AN ACTION STAYED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT GUARDIAN OF THE PROPERTY OF THE
DISABLED PERSON, AS APPROPRIATE, MUST BE SERVED.
(2) AN ACTION STAYED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE DISMISSED IF
SERVICE OF PROCESS IS NOT EFFECTUATED IN COMPLIANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any petition for the guardianship of the property of an alleged disabled
person filed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.